Oklahoma, session 2025, HB2193.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 49-143.8 of Title 11, unless
there is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
A. Except as provided in subsection B of this section and
except for persons receiving benefits pursuant to Section 49-101 of
Title 11 of the Oklahoma Statutes, any member receiving benefits
from the Oklahoma Firefighters Pension and Retirement System as of
Req. No. 12674 Page 1

RBH No. 12674
June 30, 2026, who continues to receive benefits on or after July 1,
2026, shall receive an increase in benefits as follows:
1. Zero percent (0%) if the member retired after June 30, 2023;
2. Two percent (2%) for the first Sixty Thousand Dollars
($60,000.00) of the member’s gross annual retirement benefit if the
member retired after June 30, 2018, but before July 1, 2023; and
3. Four percent (4%) for the first Sixty Thousand Dollars
($60,000.00) of the member’s gross annual retirement benefit if the
member retired before July 1, 2018.
B. Any increase in benefits a person is eligible to receive
pursuant to repealed Section 49-136 of Title 11 of the Oklahoma
Statutes after June 30, 2020, shall be used to offset the increase
in benefits provided in subsection A of this section.
C. Effective July 1, 2026, any person receiving benefits
pursuant to Section 49-101 of Title 11 of the Oklahoma Statutes
shall each receive:
1. No increase if the member retired after June 30, 2023;
2. Two percent (2%) for the first Sixty Thousand Dollars
($60,000.00) of the member’s gross annual retirement benefit if the
member retired after June 30, 2018, but before July 1, 2023; and
3. Four percent (4%) for the first Sixty Thousand Dollars
($60,000.00) of the member’s gross annual retirement benefit if the
member retired before July 1, 2018.

Req. No. 12674 Page 2

RBH No. 12674
SECTION 2. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 50-136.10 of Title 11, unless
there is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
A. Except as provided in subsection B of this section, any
member receiving benefits from the Oklahoma Police Pension and
Retirement System as of June 30, 2026, who continues to receive
benefits on or after July 1, 2026, shall receive an increase in
benefits as follows:
1. Zero percent (0%) if the member retired after June 30, 2023;
2. Two percent (2%) for the first Sixty Thousand Dollars
($60,000.00) of the member’s gross annual retirement benefit if the
member retired after June 30, 2018, but before July 1, 2023; and
3. Four percent (4%) for the first Sixty Thousand Dollars
($60,000.00) of the member’s gross annual retirement benefit if the
member retired before July 1, 2018.
B. Any increase in benefits a person is eligible to receive
pursuant to repealed Section 50-120 of Title 11 of the Oklahoma
Statutes, after June 30, 2020, shall be offset by the increase in
benefits, if any, provided by this section.
SECTION 3. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 1104L of Title 20, unless there
is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
Any member receiving benefits from the Uniform Retirement System
for Justices and Judges as of June 30, 2026, who continues to
Req. No. 12674 Page 3

RBH No. 12674
rece ive benefits on or after July 1, 2026, shall receive an increase
in benefits as follows:
1. Zero percent (0%) if the member retired after June 30, 2023;
2. Two percent (2%) for the first Sixty Thousand Dollars
($60,000.00) of the member’s gross annual retirement benefit if the
member retired after June 30, 2018, but before July 1, 2023; and
3. Four percent (4%) for the first Sixty Thousand Dollars
($60,000.00) of the member’s gross annual retirement benefit if the
member retired before July 1, 2018.
SECTION 4. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 2-305.13 of Title 47, unless
there is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
A. Except as provided in subsection B of this section, any
member receiving benefits from the Oklahoma Law Enforcement
Retirement System as of June 30, 2026, who continues to receive
benefits on or after July 1, 2026, shall receive an increase in
benefits as follows:
1. Zero percent (0%) if the member retired after June 30, 2023;
2. Two percent (2%) for the first Sixty Thousand Dollars
($60,000.00) of the member’s gross annual retirement benefit if the
member retired after June 30, 2018, but before July 1, 2023; and
3. Four percent (4%) for the first Sixty Thousand Dollars
($60,000.00) of the member’s gross annual retirement benefit if the
member retired before July 1, 2018.
Req. No. 12674 Page 4

RBH No. 12674
B. Any increase in benefits a person is eligible to receive
pursuant to subsection B, C, or D of Section 2-305 of Title 47 of
the Oklahoma Statutes after July 1, 2026, shall be offset by the
increase in benefits, if any, provided by this section.
SECTION 5. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 17-116.23 of Title 70, unless
there is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
Any person receiving benefits from the Teachers' Retirement
System of Oklahoma as of June 30, 2026, who continues to receive
benefits on or after July 1, 2026, shall receive an increase in
benefits as follows:
1. Zero percent (0%) if the member retired after June 30, 2023;
2. Two percent (2%) for the first Sixty Thousand Dollars
($60,000.00) of the member’s gross annual retirement benefit if the
member retired after June 30, 2018, but before July 1, 2023; and
3. Four percent (4%) for the first Sixty Thousand Dollars
($60,000.00) of the member’s gross annual retirement benefit if the
member retired before July 1, 2018.
SECTION 6. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 930.12 of Title 74, unless there
is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
Any member receiving benefits from the Oklahoma Public Employees
Retirement System as of June 30, 2026, who continues to receive

Req. No. 12674 Page 5

RBH No. 12674
bene fits on or after July 1, 2026, shall receive an increase in
benefits as follows:
1. Zero percent (0%) if the member retired after June 30, 2023;
2. Two percent (2%) for the first Sixty Thousand Dollars
($60,000.00) of the member’s gross annual retirement benefit if the
member retired after June 30, 2018, but before July 1, 2023; and
3. Four percent (4%) for the first Sixty Thousand Dollars
($60,000.00) of the member’s gross annual retirement benefit if the
member retired before July 1, 2018.
SECTION 7. This act shall become effective July 1, 2026.

60-1-12674 CMA 02/18/25












Req. No. 12674 Page 6